Utah statutes.
41-22-34.   Search and rescue fee -- Amount -- Deposition.

(1)  In addition to the fees imposed under Sections 41-22-8 and 41-22-33, there is imposed a search and rescue fee of 50 cents on each off-highway vehicle required to be registered or renewed under Section 41-22-3.

(2)  The fees imposed under this section shall be collected in the same manner and by the same agency designated to collect the fees imposed under this chapter.

(3)  The fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the General Fund as dedicated credits for the Search and Rescue Financial Assistance Program created under Section 53-2a-1101.



Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

